North Carolina statutes. Chapter 115D. Community Colleges.
Article 3. Financial Support.
§ 115D-40.1.
Financial Assistance for Community College Students. [Effective until July 1, 2023]

Need-Based Assistance Program. — It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Community College System make these financial aid funds available to the neediest students who are not eligible for other financial aid programs that fully cover the required educational expenses of these students. The State Board may use some of these funds as short-term loans to students who anticipate receiving the federal HOPE or Lifetime Learning Tax Credits.

Targeted Assistance. — Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the State Board may allocate up to ten percent (10%) of the funds appropriated for Financial Assistance for Community College Students to the following students:

Students who enroll in low-enrollment programs that prepare students for high-demand occupations.

Students with disabilities who have been referred by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Vocational Rehabilitation, and are enrolled in a community college.

Administration of Program. — The State Board shall adopt rules and policies for the disbursement of the financial assistance provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section. Degree, diploma, and certificate students must complete a Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) to be eligible for financial assistance. The State Board may contract with the State Education Assistance Authority for administration of these financial assistance funds. These funds shall not revert at the end of each fiscal year but shall remain available until expended for need-based financial assistance. The interest earned on the funds provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section may be used to support the costs of administering the Community College Grant Program. If the interest earnings are not adequate to support the administrative costs, up to one percent (1%) of funds provided in subsection (a) of this section may be used to support the costs of administering the Community College Grant Program.

Participation in Federal Loan Programs. — All community colleges shall participate in the William D. Ford Federal Direct Loan Program, unless the board of trustees of an institution adopts a resolution declining to participate in the Program. The State Board shall ensure that at least one counselor is available at each college to inform students about federal programs and funds available to assist community college students, including, but not limited to, Pell Grants, HOPE and Lifetime Learning Tax Credits, and, for participating colleges, the William D. Ford Federal Direct Loan Program, and to actively encourage students to utilize these federal programs and funds. The board of trustees of any institution that has declined to participate in the William D. Ford Federal Direct Loan Program through the adoption of a resolution may rescind the resolution and participate in the Program but shall not have the authority to again decline participation in the Program.

History.

1999-237, s. 9.4(a), (b); 2001-229, ss. 1, 2; 2003-52, s. 1; 2003-385, s. 1; 2009-451, s. 8.4; 2010-31, s. 8.5(b); 2011-148, ss. 1, 2; 2011-154, ss. 1, 2; 2011-155, ss. 1, 2; 2011-178, ss. 1, 2; 2012-31, s. 1; 2012-142, s. 8.11(c); 2013-360, s. 10.13; 2013-410, s. 43.

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 115D-40.1

.

§ 115D-40.1.
Targeted Financial Assistance for Community College Students; participation in federal programs. [Effective July 1, 2023]

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 8A.2(g), effective July 1, 2023.

Targeted Financial Assistance. — Within the funds available, the State Board may provide financial assistance to the following students:

Students who enroll in low-enrollment programs that prepare students for high-demand occupations.

Students with disabilities who have been referred by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Vocational Rehabilitation, and are enrolled in a community college.

Students enrolled in fewer than six credit hours per semester who otherwise qualify for need-based financial aid programs.

Administration of Targeted Financial Assistance. — The State Board shall adopt rules and policies for the disbursement of the targeted financial assistance provided in subsection (b) of this section. Degree, diploma, and certificate students must complete a Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) to be eligible for financial assistance. The State Board may contract with the State Education Assistance Authority for administration of these targeted financial assistance funds.

Participation in Federal Loan Programs. — All community colleges shall participate in the William D. Ford Federal Direct Loan Program, unless the board of trustees of an institution adopts a resolution declining to participate in the Program. The State Board shall ensure that at least one counselor is available at each college to inform students about federal programs and funds available to assist community college students, including, but not limited to, Pell Grants, HOPE and Lifetime Learning Tax Credits, and, for participating colleges, the William D. Ford Federal Direct Loan Program, and to actively encourage students to utilize these federal programs and funds. The board of trustees of any institution that has declined to participate in the William D. Ford Federal Direct Loan Program through the adoption of a resolution may rescind the resolution and participate in the Program but shall not have the authority to again decline participation in the Program.

History.

1999-237, s. 9.4(a), (b); 2001-229, ss. 1, 2; 2003-52, s. 1; 2003-385, s. 1; 2009-451, s. 8.4; 2010-31, s. 8.5(b); 2011-148, ss. 1, 2; 2011-154, ss. 1, 2; 2011-155, ss. 1, 2; 2011-178, ss. 1, 2; 2012-31, s. 1; 2012-142, s. 8.11(c); 2013-360, s. 10.13; 2013-410, s. 43; 2021-180, s. 8A.2(g).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 115D-40.1

.

§ 115D-40.2.
Semester limitation on eligibility for North Carolina Community College grants. [Repealed effective July 1, 2023 — see note]

Except as otherwise provided by this section, a student shall not receive a need-based grant from the North Carolina Community College Grant Program for more than six full-time academic semesters, or the equivalent if enrolled part-time.

Upon application by a student, the community college may grant a waiver to the student who may then receive a grant from the North Carolina Community College Grant Program for the equivalent of one additional full-time academic semester if the student demonstrates that any of the following have substantially disrupted or interrupted the student’s pursuit of a degree, diploma, or certificate: (i) a military service obligation, (ii) serious medical debilitation, (iii) a short-term or long-term disability, or (iv) other extraordinary hardship. The State Board shall establish policies and procedures to implement the waiver provided by this subsection.

History.

2013-360, s. 11.15(c).

Delayed Repeal of Section.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(h), repealed this section effective July 1, 2023.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 115D-40.2.
Semester limitation on eligibility for North Carolina Community College grants. [Repealed effective July 1, 2023 — see note]

History.

2013-360, s. 11.15(c); repealed by 2021-180, s. 8A.2(h), effective July 1, 2023.

Delayed Repeal of Section.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(h), repealed this section effective July 1, 2023.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 115D-40.5.
Annual report on NC Community College Childcare Grant Program.

On December 1 of each year, the Community Colleges System Office shall report to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Education/Higher Education, the House Appropriations Committee on Education, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the administration of the North Carolina Community College Childcare Grant Program for the prior fiscal year. The report shall include at least the following information by each community college:

The number of applications received for grants from the program.

The amount of grant funds requested from the program.

The number of applications approved.

The total amount of grant funds awarded.

The range of the dollar amount of grant awards to individuals for child care expenses.

The types of child care utilized by students with grant funds, including before-school and after-school services.

History.

2021-180, s. 6.4(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 6.4(b), provides: “Notwithstanding

G.S. 115D-40.5

, as enacted by this act, the Community Colleges System Office shall submit an initial report on the administration of the North Carolina Community College Childcare Grant Program pursuant to

G.S. 115D-40.5

on March 1, 2022. The Community Colleges System Office shall submit its first annual report pursuant to G.S. 115D-40.5 on December 1, 2022.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 115D-41.
Restrictions on contracts with local school administrative units; use of community college facilities by public school students pursuant to cooperative programs.

Community college contracts with local school administrative units shall not be used by these agencies to supplant funding for a public school high school teacher providing courses offered pursuant to

G.S. 115D-20(4)

who is already employed by the local school administrative unit. In no event shall a community college contract with a local school administrative unit to provide high school level courses.

Existing community college facilities that comply with the North Carolina State Building Code and applicable local ordinances for community college facilities may be used without modification for public school students in joint or cooperative programs such as middle or early college programs and dual enrollment programs. Designs for new community college facilities that comply with the North Carolina State Building Code and applicable local ordinances for community college facilities also may be used without modification for these students.For the purpose of establishing Use and Occupancy Classifications, these programs shall be considered “Business — Group B” in the same manner as other community college uses.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 82(a); 2006-66, s. 8.11(a); 2006-221, s. 5; 2009-206, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 7.1A(g).

§ 115D-42.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-5, s. 9.6(a), effective July 1, 2018.

History.

2003-284, s. 8.14(a); repealed by 2018-5, s. 9.6(a), effective July 1, 2018.

§ 115D-43.
Funds for an intercollegiate athletics program.

No State funds, student tuition receipts, or student aid funds shall be used to create, support, maintain, or operate an intercollegiate athletics program at a community college.

History.

2011-145, s. 8.10.

§ 115D-44.

Reserved for future codification purposes.